North Dakota, session 69, HB1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 15.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
State-funded construction program - Requirements for school district participation.
1. To be eligible for state funding for new school construction under this section, a school
district shall provide to the superintendent of public instruction a report, in the manner
prescribed by the superintendent, demonstrating:
a. The cost of renovation of the school district's physical plant exceeds sixty percen t
of the cost for new construction.
b. For consideration for funding through June 30, 2026, a failed referendum for new
school construction or renovation between July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2025 .
c. For consideration for funding on July 1, 2026, or after, a failed referendum for
new school construction or renovation that occurred after July 1, 2025 .
d. The school district has or will obtain the funds required for the school district's
percentage share of construction costs by any means permitted by law, including
a referendum.
e. The school district's plan to sufficiently fund maintenance of the new building.
Page No. 1 25.1306.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
f. An assessment of the school district's physical plant by an approved engineering
firm, using a form developed by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the architectural firm selected by the superintendent.
g. The assessment of the school district's physical plant by an approved
engineering firm demonstrates renovation or new school construction is an
immediate need.
2. For a school district qualifying for forty percen t or more of costs of construction paid by
the state under this section, the school district shall use the approved state
architectural design, unless the school district elects to receive twenty percent of the
costs of construction and select another architectural design according to the
provisions of this chapter.
Reorganization waivers.
The superintendent of public instruction may waive any of the requirements under this
chapter and related rules for school districts reorganizing under chapter 15.1 - 12 to build a new
school.
Funding rates.
1. Except as provided under subsection 2, the percentage of funding the state wil l
contribute to new school construction is determined by the value of a mill for each
school district as described under this section. If the value of a mill is:
a. Less than five thousand dollars, the state shall pay ninety-five percent of the cost
of new school construction.
b. Five thousand dollars to ten thousand dollars, the state shall pay ninety percent
of the cost of new school construction.
c. More than ten thousand dollars and no more than fifteen thousand dollars, the
state shall pay eighty percent of the cost of new school construction.
d. More than fifteen thousand dollars and no more than twenty-five thousand
dollars, the state shall pay seventy percent of the cost of new school
construction.
e. More than twenty-five thousand dollars and no more than thirty-five thousand
dollars, the state shall pay sixty percent of the cost of new school construction.
Page No. 2 25.1306.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
f. More than thirty-five thousand dollars and no more than fifty thousand dollars, the
state shall pay fifty percent of the cost of new school construction.
g. More than fifty thousand dollars and no more than sixty-five thousand dollars, the
state shall pay forty percent of the cost of new school construction.
h. More than sixty-five thousand dollars and no more than ninety-five thousand
dollars, the state shall pay twenty percent of the cost of new school construction.
i. More than ninety-five thousand dollars, the state shall pay five percent of the cost
of new school construction.
2. A school district eligible for federal funding for school construction may receive up to
twelve and one - half percent of the cost of new school construction under this chapter
after applying for and receiving federal funding.
Selection of architectural firm.
1. The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint five individuals to participate in
an evaluation committee to select an architectural firm to perform the responsibilities
under this section. The committee must include a faculty member from the department
of architecture at North Dakota state university and a school district facility manager
from a school district with more than five thousand students.
2. To be considered for the architectural design program under this section, an
architectural firm shall apply to the superintendent of public instruction in the manner
prescribed by the superintendent. The evaluation committee shall give priority to firms
with:
a. A committed presence in the state, including at least seventy percent of firm
employees residing in the state and seventy-five percent of the firm's revenue
derived from in - state work .
b. A successful portfolio of kindergarten through grade twelve construction projects,
including at least five projects successfully completed in the last ten years.
c. Innovation, including environments created for specific curriculum and anticipated
educational trends.
d. Positive in - state references .
e. Demonstrated cost-saving strategies and fiscal responsibility.
Page No. 3 25.1306.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. The superintendent of public instruction shall enter a contract with the selected
architectural firm for a term of three years, with renewal of the contract conditioned
upon the committee's evaluation of the firm's performance during the term.
4. The architectural firm shall create scalable, cost-effective, and flexible designs for an
elementary school, middle school, high school, and kindergarten through grade twelve
facilities.
Selection of construction managers.
1. The superintendent of public instruction and the selected architectural firm shall selec t
regional construction managers for construction projects funded under this section.
Priority must be given to regional construction managers having a committed presence
in the state, including at least seventy percent of firm employees residing in the state
and seventy-five percent of the firm's revenue derived from in - state work .
2. The architectural firm and the superintendent shall evaluate the performance o f
construction managers every three years.
Approval of architectural plans.
The superintendent of public instruction , construction managers, and architectural firm shal l
evaluate and approve architectural plans for schools.
Rules.
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules under chapter 28 - 32 to implemen t
this chapter.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - STATE-
FUNDED SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general
fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $600,000,000, or so much of
the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of a new
school building construction grant program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through July 1, 2035, and after that
date is ineffective.
Page No. 4 25.1306.05000